Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.370

Assistance for parolees and discharged prisoners—Repayment agreement.

The secretary of corrections or his or her designee shall enter into a written agreement with every person receiving funds under RCW 9.95.310 through 9.95.370 that such person will repay such funds under the terms and conditions in said agreement. No person shall receive funds until such an agreement is validly made. This section applies to persons convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 352; 1981 c 136 s 50; 1971 ex.s. c 31 s 7; 1961 c 217 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.